en: Pumpkin and Squash plant products, Pumpkin plant products, Squash plant products
de: Kürbisprodukte, Produkte aus Kürbisgewächsen
es: Productos de la planta de la calabaza
fi: kurpitsatuotteet
fr: Produits de la plante de courge
hr: Biljni proizvodi od bundeve i tikve
it: Prodotti di zucca
la: Cucurbita
nl: Pompoenproducten

en: Pumpkin seeds, Squash seeds, raw pumpkin seeds, Dried pumpkin and squash seeds
ar: لب
be: Насенне гарбуза
bg: Тиквено семе
ca: Llavor de carabassa
da: Græskarkerner
de: Kürbiskerne
el: Πασατέμπος
es: Semillas de calabaza, Pepitas de calabaza, Pipas de calabaza
eu: Kuia-pipita
fa: تخم‌کدو
fi: kurpitsan siemenet
fr: Graines de courge, graines de citrouille
hr: Sjemenke bundeve
id: Biji labu
it: Semi di zucca, Seme di zucca
ja: かぼちゃの種
jv: Wiji waluh
ko: 호박씨
la: Cucurbitae semen
ln: Mbíka
nl: Pompoenpitten
pl: Pestki dyni
pt: Semente de abóbora
ru: Семя тыквы
sl: Bučno seme
sv: Pumpakärnor
ta: பூசணி விதை
tr: Kabak çekirdeği
tt: Кабак төше
uk: Насіння гарбуза
vi: Hạt bí
zh: 南瓜籽

en: Roasted pumpkin seeds
da: Ristede græskarkerner
de: geröstete Kürbiskerne
es: Semillas de calabaza tostadas, Pipas de calabaza tostadas
fr: Graines de courge grillées
hr: Pečene sjemenke bundeve
nl: Geroosterde pompoenpitten
pl: Prażone pestki dyni
sv: Rostade pumpakärnor

en: Non-roasted pumpkin seeds, Pumpkin seeds (non-roasted)
da: Ikke-ristede græskarkerner
fr: Graines de courge non-grillées
nl: Ongeroosterd pompoenpitten, Pompoenpitten (ongeroosterd)
sv: Orostade pumpakärnor

en: Unshelled pumpkin seeds, In-shell pumpkin seeds
de: Ungeschälte Kürbiskerne, Kürbiskerne-In-Schale
es: Semillas de calabaza con cáscara, Pipas de calabaza con cáscara
fr: Graines de courge en coque
hr: Sjemenke bundeve bez ljuske
nl: Pompoenpitten in de schil
pl: Pestki dyni niełuskane

en: Shelled pumpkin seeds
de: Geschälte Kürbiskerne
es: Semillas de calabaza sin cáscara
fr: Graines de courge décortiquées
hr: Oljuštene sjemenke bundeve
nl: Gepelde pompoenpitten
pl: Pestki dyni łuskane

en: Roasted unshelled pumpkin seeds
es: Semillas de calabaza con cáscara tostadas, Pipas de calabaza con cáscara tostadas
fr: Graines de courge en coque grillées
hr: Pečene sjemenke bundeve bez ljuske
nl: Ongepelde geroosterde pompoenpitten

en: Roasted shelled pumpkin seeds
es: Semillas de calabaza sin cáscara tostadas, Pipas de calabaza sin cáscara tostadas
fr: Graines de courge décortiquées grillées
hr: Pečene oljuštene sjemenke bundeve
nl: Geroosterde gepelde pompoenpitten

en: Non-roasted unsalted shelled pumpkin seeds, Pumpkin seeds (non-roasted/shelled/unsalted)
fr: Graines de courge (non-grillées/non-salées/décortiquées)
nl: Pompoenpitten (gepeld/ongeroosterd/ongezouten)

en: Cucurbitacea seeds
fr: Graines de cucurbitacées

en: Melon seeds
fr: Graines de melon

en: Cotton seeds
fr: Graines de coton

en: Sunflower seeds and their products
de: Sonnenblumenkerne und Sonnenblumenkernprodukte
es: Semillas de girasol y derivados, Pipas de girasol y derivados
fi: auringonkukan siemenet ja siementuotteet
fr: Graines de tournesol et dérivés
hr: Sjemenke suncokreta i njihovi proizvodi
hu: Naprafogómag és belőle készült termékek
it: Semi di girasole e derivati
la: Helianthus annuus
nl: Zonnebloempitten en afgeleiden
pl: Pestki słonecznika i ich produkty
pt: Sementes de girasol e derivados

en: Sunflower seeds, Sunflower seed, raw sunflower seeds
bg: Слънчогледови семки, слънчогледово семе
ca: Pipes de gira-sol, Llavors de gira-sol
de: Sonnenblumenkerne
es: Semillas de girasol, Pipas de girasol
fi: Auringonkukansiemen, auringonkukan siemenet
fr: Graines de tournesol
hr: Sjemenke suncokreta
hu: Naprafogómagok
it: Semi di girasole
ja: ひまわりの種
nl: Zonnebloempitten
pl: Pestki słonecznika, Pestki słonecznikowe, Nasiona słonecznika
pt: Sementes de girassol
ru: Семена подсолнечника, Подсолнечные семечки, Семечки подсолнечника
sv: Solroskärnor
tr: Ayçiçeği çekirdeği, Ayçiçek çekirdeği

en: Roasted sunflower seeds
bg: Печени слънчогледови семки
de: Geröstete Sonnenblumenkerne
es: Semillas de girasol tostadas, Pipas de girasol tostadas
fi: Paahdetut auringonkukansiemenet
fr: Graines de tournesol grillées
hr: Pržene sjemenke suncokreta
it: Semi di girasole tostati
nl: Geroosterde zonnebloempitten
ru: Семена подсолнечника обжаренные, Обжаренные семена подсолнечника Подсолнечные семечки обжаренные, Обжаренные семечки подсолнечника, Семена подсолнечника жареные, Жареные семена подсолнечника Подсолнечные семечки жареные, Жареные семечки подсолнечника
sv: rostade solroskärnor

en: Shelled sunflower seeds
bg: Белени слънчогледови семки
de: geschälte Sonnenblumenkerne
es: Semillas de girasol sin cáscara
fi: Kuoritut auringonkukansiemenet, kuorittuja auringonkukansiemeniä
fr: Graines de tournesol décortiquées
hr: Oljuštene sjemenke suncokreta
it: Semi di girasole sgusciati
nl: Gepelde zonnebloempitten
sv: skallade solroskärnor
tr: Kabuklu ayçiçeği çekirdeği

en: Unshelled sunflower seeds, In-shell sunflower seeds
de: ungeschälte Sonnenblumenkerne
es: Semillas de girasol con cáscara, Pipas de girasol con cáscara
fi: kuorimattomia auringonkukansiemeniä
fr: Graines de tournesol en coque
hr: Sjemenke suncokreta bez ljuske
nl: Ongepelde zonnebloempitten
ru: Ядра семян подсолнечника очищенные, Семена подсолнечника очищенные
sv: oskallade solroskärnor

en: Roasted unshelled sunflower seeds
es: Semillas de girasol con cáscara tostadas, Pipas de girasol con cáscara tostadas
fr: Graines de tournesol en coque grillées
hr: Pržene sjemenke suncokreta bez ljuske
nl: Geroosterde ongepelde zonnebloempitten
sv: rostade oskallade solroskärnor

en: Roasted shelled sunflower seeds
de: Ungeschälte geröstete Sonnenblumenkerne
es: Semillas de girasol sin cáscara tostadas, Pipas de girasol sin cáscara tostadas
fr: Graines de tournesol décortiquées grillées
hr: Pržene oljuštene sjemenke suncokreta
it: Semi di frutti di mare sgusciati arrosto
nl: Geroosterde gepelde zonnebloempitten
sv: rostade skallade solroskärnor

en: Sunflower seed grilled and salted
fr: Graines de tournesol grillées et salées
sv: rostade saltade solroskärnor